Washington statutes.
RCW 16.70.030

Emergency action authorized—Scope—Animals as public nuisance.

In the event of an emergency arising out of an outbreak of communicable disease caused by exposure to or contact with pet animals, the secretary is hereby authorized to take any reasonable action deemed necessary by him or her to protect the public health, including but not limited to the use of quarantine or the institution of any legal action authorized pursuant to Title 7 RCW and RCW 43.70.170, 43.70.180, and 43.70.190.

The secretary shall have authority to destroy any pet animal or animals which may reasonably be suspected of having a communicable disease dangerous to humans and such animal or animals are hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

[ 2011 c 336 s 445; 1971 c 72 s 3.]